District of Columbia statutes.
31-4003

Commissioner to establish liability coverage levels.

For purposes of this chapter, the Commissioner shall establish liability coverage levels in rulemaking pursuant to the provisions of subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

History

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-140, § 4, 37 DCR 2651
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10, 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 34, 45 DCR 745

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-2503.